District of Columbia statutes.
33-406

Repealed

Rules for determining the existence of a partnership.

Repealed.

Sept. 27, 1962, 76 Stat. 637, Pub. L. 87-709, § 7
Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-234, § 1203, 44 DCR 777
1981 Ed., § 41-106.
1973 Ed., § 41-306.